el: Τύπος μέσου αποθήκευσης: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Άλλο
es: Tipo de medio de almacenamiento: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Otros
nb: Type lagringsmedia: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Annet
ko: 저장 매체 유형: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; 기타
ru: Тип носителя: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta medija za pohranu: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ pamäťového média: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Iné
th: ประเภทสื่อจัดเก็บข้อมูล: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di supporto di storage: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Altro
fr: Type de support multimédia de stockage: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Autre
da: Lagermedietype: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Andet
hu: Adathordozó típusa: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Egyéb
zh-CN: 存储媒体文件类型: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; 其他
lt-LT: Laikmenos tipas: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de mídia de armazenamento: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta pomnilniškega medija: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип носител за съхранение: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de conteúdo multimédia de armazenamento: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Outro
zh-TW: 儲存多媒體檔案類型: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; 其他
sv: Typ av lagringsmedia: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Övrigt
cs: Typ paměťového média: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Jiné
de: Speichermedientyp: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Sonstiges
nl: Opslagmediatype: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Andere
ja: ストレージメディアの種類: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; その他
fi: Tallennusvälinetyyppi: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Muu
pl: Typ nośnika pamięci masowej: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Inne
ro-RO: Tipul suportului de stocare: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Altele
en: Storage media type: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Other
vi: Loại phương tiện lưu trữ: Ổ đĩa cứng (HDD); Môi trường phát triển tích hợp; Bộ nhớ bất biến tốc hành; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA); Ổ đĩa cứng (SSD); Khác
tr: Depolama Ortamı Türü: HDD; IDE; NVMe; SATA; SSD; Diğer